Hawaii statutes.
§651-50 Liability for exceeding powers.
The officer serving any execution shall act upon the officer's own private
accountability, for all excesses of the officer's official powers, and for any
departure from the legal import of the writ or mandate in the officer's hands.
[CC 1859, §1028; RL 1925, §2452; RL 1935, §4153; RL 1945, §10180; RL 1955,
§233-49; HRS §651-50; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next